ncx.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%>
%<n%>
%<abs%>
%<pl%>
%<dim%>
%<px1sg%>
%<px2sg%>
%<px3sg%>
%<px1pl%>
%<px2pl%>
%<px3pl%>

%{m%} 
%{i%}


@P.Px.Sg@                                ! Posesivo singular
@R.Px.Sg@
@P.Px.Pl@                                ! Posesivo plural
@R.Px.Pl@
@D.Px@                                   ! Ninguna posesión
@R.Px@
@P.Sa.Sg@                                ! Sujeto singular
@R.Sa.Sg@
@P.Sa.Pl@                                ! Sujeto plural
@R.Sa.Pl@
@P.Sa.2@                                 ! Sujeto es 2da persona (necesario para el honorífico)
@R.Sa.2@
@P.Sa.3@
@D.Sa.3@
@D.Sa@                                   ! Ningún sujeto
@D.Sa.Pl@ 
@D.Sa.Sg@


LEXICON Root
Nominal ;
@P.Sa.Pl@:@P.Sa.Pl@ Nominal ;


LEXICON Nominal
Possession ;
Nouns ;


LEXICON Possession

@P.Px.Sg@%<px1sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@no%>               Nouns ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px2sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@mo%>               Nouns ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px3sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@i%>                Nouns ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px1pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@to%>               Nouns ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px2pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@namo%>             Nouns ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px3pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@in%{m%}%{i%}%>     Nouns ;


LEXICON TLSuff
@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%>tl    # ;
@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%<n%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@               # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             TsinSuff ;

LEXICON TLISuff
@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%>tli   # ;
@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%<n%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@               # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             TsinSuff ;


LEXICON LISuff
@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%>li    # ;
@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%<n%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@               # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             TsinSuff ;

LEXICON NullSuff
@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@@D.Sa.Pl@        # ;
@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%<n%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@               # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             TsinSuff ;


LEXICON Plural
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Px@%<pl%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Px@%>mej          # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%<pl%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Px@%>uan          # ;


LEXICON TsinSuff
@D.Sa.Pl@%<dim%>:@D.Sa.Pl@%>tsin                # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Px@%<dim%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Px@%>tsitsintin          # ;
@R.Px@@R.Sa.Pl@%<dim%>:@R.Px@@R.Sa.Pl@%>tsitsin # ;


LEXICON Nouns
siuatl:siua                       TLSuff ;
maitl:mai                         TLSuff ;
tlaltikpaktlakatl:tlaltikpaktlaka TLSuff ;
xochitl:xochi                     TLSuff ;
takotl:tako                       TLSuff ;
neluayotl:neluayo                 TLSuff ;

itskuintli:itskuin                TLISuff ;
amochtli:amoch                    TLISuff ;
tlapechtli:tlapech                TLISuff ;


kali:kal                          LISuff ;
tlakuikali:tlakuikal              LISuff ;
tsotsoli:tsotsol                  LISuff ;

mixton:mixton                     NullSuff ;
tsonteko:tsonteko                 NullSuff ;
yolikni:yolikni                   NullSuff ;
